Maryland, session 2025, SB0681.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Courts and Judicial Proceedings
3–2A–01.
(a) In this subtitle the following terms have the meanings indicated unless the
context of their use requires otherwise.
(f) (1) “Health care provider” means a hospital, a related institution as defined
in § 19–301 of the Health – General Article, a medical day care center, a hospice care
program, an assisted living program, a freestanding ambulatory care facility as defined in
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *sb0681*

SENATE BILL 681
§ 19–3B–01 of the Health – General Article, a physician, a physician assistant, an
osteopath, an optometrist, a chiropractor, a registered or licensed practical nurse, a dentist,
a podiatrist, a psychologist, a licensed certified social worker–clinical, AN EMPLOYEE,
AGENT, OR CONTRACTOR OF A HOSPITAL WHO IS LICENSED, CERTIFIED,
REGISTERED, OR OTHERWISE AUTHORIZED TO RENDER HEALTH CARE SERVICES IN
MARYLAND, and a physical therapist, licensed or authorized to provide one or more health
care services in Maryland.
(2) “Health care provider” does not include any nursing institution
conducted by and for those who rely upon treatment by spiritual means through prayer
alone in accordance with the tenets and practices of a recognized church or religious
denomination.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2025.